Utah statutes.
31A-22-1001.   Obligation to write workers' compensation insurance.

The Workers' Compensation Fund created under Chapter 33, shall write all workers' compensation insurance for which application is made to the Workers' Compensation Fund.  This requirement does not apply to any other insurer.



Amended by Chapter 222, 2000 General Session

